Illinois, session 104th, HB3548.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 5changing Section 5-601 and by adding Section 5-602 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 405/5-601)7    Sec. 5-601. Trial. 8    (1) When a petition has been filed alleging that the minor 9is a delinquent, a trial must be held within 120 days of a 10written demand for such hearing made by any party, except that 11when the State, without success, has exercised due diligence 12to obtain evidence material to the case and there are 13reasonable grounds to believe that the evidence may be 14obtained at a later date, the court may, upon motion by the 15State, continue the trial for not more than 30 additional 16days.17    (2) If a minor respondent has multiple delinquency 18petitions pending against the minor in the same county and 19simultaneously demands a trial upon more than one delinquency 20petition pending against the minor in the same county, the 21minor shall receive a trial or have a finding, after waiver of 22trial, upon at least one such petition before expiration 23relative to any of the pending petitions of the period   HB3548- 2 -LRB104 10169 RLC 20241 b1described by this Section. All remaining petitions thus 2pending against the minor respondent shall be adjudicated 3within 120 160 days from the date on which a finding relative 4to the first petition prosecuted is rendered under Section 55-620 of this Article, or, if the trial upon the first petition 6is terminated without a finding and there is no subsequent 7trial, or adjudication after waiver of trial, on the first 8petition within a reasonable time, the minor shall receive a 9trial upon all of the remaining petitions within 120 160 days 10from the date on which the trial, or finding after waiver of 11trial, on the first petition is concluded. If either such 12period of 120 160 days expires without the commencement of 13trial, or adjudication after waiver of trial, of any of the 14remaining pending petitions, the petition or petitions shall 15be dismissed and barred for want of prosecution unless the 16delay is occasioned by any of the reasons described in this 17Section.18    (3) When no such trial is held within the time required by 19subsections (1) and (2) of this Section, the court shall, upon 20motion by any party, dismiss the petition with prejudice.21    (3.5) The period in which a trial shall be held as 22prescribed by this Section is tolled by: (i) delay occasioned 23by the minor; (ii) a continuance allowed pursuant to Section 24114-4 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 after the 25court's determination of the minor's incapacity for trial; 26(iii) an interlocutory appeal; (iv) an examination of fitness   HB3548- 3 -LRB104 10169 RLC 20241 b1ordered pursuant to Section 104-13 of the Code of Criminal 2Procedure of 1963; (v) a fitness hearing; or (vi) an 3adjudication of unfitness for trial. Any such delay shall 4temporarily suspend, for the time of the delay, the period 5within which a trial must be held as prescribed by this 6Section. On the day of expiration of the delays, the period 7shall continue at the point at which the time was suspended.8    (4) (Blank). Without affecting the applicability of the 9tolling and multiple prosecution provisions of subsections (8) 10and (2) of this Section when a petition has been filed alleging 11that the minor is a delinquent and the minor is in detention or 12shelter care, the trial shall be held within 30 calendar days 13after the date of the order directing detention or shelter 14care, or the earliest possible date in compliance with the 15provisions of Section 5-525 as to the custodial parent, 16guardian, or legal custodian, but no later than 45 calendar 17days from the date of the order of the court directing 18detention or shelter care. When the petition alleges the minor 19has committed an offense involving a controlled substance as 20defined in the Illinois Controlled Substances Act or 21methamphetamine as defined in the Methamphetamine Control and 22Community Protection Act, the court may, upon motion of the 23State, continue the trial for receipt of a confirmatory 24laboratory report for up to 45 days after the date of the order 25directing detention or shelter care. When the petition alleges 26the minor committed an offense that involves the death of,   HB3548- 4 -LRB104 10169 RLC 20241 b1great bodily harm to or sexual assault or aggravated criminal 2sexual abuse on a victim, the court may, upon motion of the 3State, continue the trial for not more than 70 calendar days 4after the date of the order directing detention or shelter 5care.6    Any failure to comply with the time limits of this Section 7shall require the immediate release of the minor from 8detention, and the time limits set forth in subsections (1) 9and (2) shall apply.10    (4.5) Agreeing to a continuance for trial or status based 11on the failure of the State to complete discovery shall not be 12considered a delay occasioned by the minor for purposes of 13subsection (3.5). Further, demanding trial under subsection 14(1) or (2) does not relieve the State of its ongoing duty to 15tender discovery.16    (5) If the court determines that the State, without 17success, has exercised due diligence to timely obtain the 18results of DNA testing that is material to the case, and that 19there are reasonable grounds to believe that the results may 20be obtained at a later date, the court may continue the cause 21on application of the State for not more than 60 120 additional 22days, except if the petition alleges that the minor has 23committed the offense of first degree murder in violation of 24Section 9-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012 or aggravated 25criminal sexual assault in violation of Section 11-1.30 of the 26Criminal Code of 2012, the court may continue the cause on   HB3548- 5 -LRB104 10169 RLC 20241 b1application of the State for not more than 120 days. The court 2may also extend the period of detention of the minor for not 3more than 120 additional days.4    (6) (Blank). If the State's Attorney makes a written 5request that a proceeding be designated an extended juvenile 6jurisdiction prosecution, and the minor is in detention, the 7period the minor can be held in detention pursuant to 8subsection (4), shall be extended an additional 30 days after 9the court determines whether the proceeding will be designated 10an extended juvenile jurisdiction prosecution or the State's 11Attorney withdraws the request for extended juvenile 12jurisdiction prosecution.13    (7) (Blank). When the State's Attorney files a motion for 14waiver of jurisdiction pursuant to Section 5-805, and the 15minor is in detention, the period the minor can be held in 16detention pursuant to subsection (4), shall be extended an 17additional 30 days if the court denies motion for waiver of 18jurisdiction or the State's Attorney withdraws the motion for 19waiver of jurisdiction.20    (8) (Blank). The period in which a trial shall be held as 21prescribed by subsection (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), or (7) 22of this Section is tolled by: (i) delay occasioned by the 23minor; (ii) a continuance allowed pursuant to Section 114-4 of 24the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 after the court's 25determination of the minor's incapacity for trial; (iii) an 26interlocutory appeal; (iv) an examination of fitness ordered   HB3548- 6 -LRB104 10169 RLC 20241 b1pursuant to Section 104-13 of the Code of Criminal Procedure 2of 1963; (v) a fitness hearing; or (vi) an adjudication of 3unfitness for trial. Any such delay shall temporarily suspend, 4for the time of the delay, the period within which a trial must 5be held as prescribed by subsections (1), (2), (4), (5), and 6(6) of this Section. On the day of expiration of the delays, 7the period shall continue at the point at which the time was 8suspended.9    (9) (Blank). Nothing in this Section prevents the minor or 10the minor's parents, guardian, or legal custodian from 11exercising their respective rights to waive the time limits 12set forth in this Section.13(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 14    (705 ILCS 405/5-602 new)15    Sec. 5-602. Pretrial detention.16    (1) When a petition has been filed alleging that the minor 17is a delinquent and the minor is in detention or shelter care, 18the trial shall be held within 30 calendar days after the date 19of the order directing detention or shelter care, or the 20earliest possible date in compliance with the provisions of 21Section 5-525 as to the custodial parent, guardian, or legal 22custodian but no later than 45 calendar days from the date of 23the order of the court directing detention or shelter care. 24This time includes any time a minor spends in custody on a 25release upon request to Department of Children and Family   HB3548- 7 -LRB104 10169 RLC 20241 b1Services status. When the petition alleges the minor committed 2an offense that involves the death of or great bodily harm to a 3victim, the court may, upon motion of the State, continue the 4trial for not more than 70 calendar days after the date of the 5order directing detention or shelter care.6    (2) Any failure to comply with the time limits of this 7Section shall require the immediate release of the minor from 8detention and the time limits set forth in subsections (1) and 9(2) of Section 5-601 shall apply.10    (3) As the speedy trial provisions outlined in Section 115-601 and this Section are distinctly separate statute 12Sections, a minor need not demand trial for this Section to 13apply.14    (4) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of 15Section 5-601, the detention provisions of this Section govern 16a minor who has multiple delinquency petitions filed against 17him or her. A minor shall not be held longer than the times 18described in this Section while awaiting trial. If immediate 19and urgent necessity has been found pursuant to Section 5-501 20ordering a minor to be held, the hold shall be on all pending 21cases.22    (5) If the State's Attorney makes a written request that a 23proceeding be designated an extended juvenile jurisdiction 24prosecution, and the minor is in detention, the period the 25minor may be held in detention may be extended an additional 30 26days. A pending extended juvenile jurisdiction petition shall   HB3548- 8 -LRB104 10169 RLC 20241 b1not be a basis for detention past the prescribed time periods 2in this Section.3    (6) When the State's Attorney files a motion for waiver of 4jurisdiction pursuant to Section 5-805, and the minor is in 5detention, the period the minor may be held in detention may be 6extended an additional 30 days. A pending transfer petition 7shall not be a basis for detention past the prescribed time 8periods in this Section.9    (6.5) If the court determines that the State, without 10success, has exercised due diligence to timely obtain the 11results of DNA testing that is material to the case, and that 12there are reasonable grounds to believe that the results may 13be obtained at a later date, the court may extend the period of 14detention of the minor to not more than 70 days, only for any 15matter for which the minor may be committed to the Department 16of Juvenile Justice. 17    (7) The period in which a trial shall be held as prescribed 18by this Section is tolled by: (i) delay occasioned by the 19minor; (ii) a continuance allowed pursuant to Section 114-4 of 20the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 after the court's 21determination of the minor's incapacity for trial; (iii) an 22interlocutory appeal; (iv) an examination of fitness ordered 23pursuant to Section 104-13 of the Code of Criminal Procedure 24of 1963; (v) a fitness hearing; or (vi) an adjudication of 25unfitness for trial. Any such delay shall temporarily suspend, 26for the time of the delay, the period within which a trial must   HB3548- 9 -LRB104 10169 RLC 20241 b1be held as prescribed by this Section.2    (8) Agreeing to a continuance for trial or status based on 3the failure of the State to complete discovery shall not be 4considered a delay occasioned by the minor for purposes of 5this Section. Time needed to prepare a defense to a State 6motion such as an extended juvenile jurisdiction petition in 7subsection (5) or a transfer petition in subsection (6) shall 8not be considered a delay occasioned by the minor.  HB3548- 10 -LRB104 10169 RLC 20241 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    705 ILCS 405/5-6014    705 ILCS 405/5-602 new